Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1904
Custody; who entitled.

If a state agency caused an abandoned vehicle described in subdivision (1)(e) or (2)(d) of section 60-1901 to be removed from public property, the state agency shall be entitled to custody of the vehicle. If a state agency caused an abandoned vehicle described in subdivision (1)(a), (b), (c), or (d) or (2)(a), (b), or (c) of section 60-1901 to be removed from public property, the state agency shall deliver the vehicle to the local authority which shall have custody. The local authority entitled to custody of an abandoned vehicle shall be the county in which the vehicle was abandoned or, if abandoned in a city or village, the city or village in which the vehicle was abandoned.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 116, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 42.